src/Korektor/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1862 Y 28
SFX 1862 јети јети
SFX 1862 јети ијем
SFX 1862 јети ијеш
SFX 1862 јети ије
SFX 1862 јети ијемо
SFX 1862 јети ијете
SFX 1862 јети ију
SFX 1862 јети ио
SFX 1862 јети јела
SFX 1862 јети јело
SFX 1862 јети јели
SFX 1862 јети јеле
SFX 1862 јети јећу
SFX 1862 јети јећеш
SFX 1862 јети јеће
SFX 1862 јети јећемо
SFX 1862 јети јећете
SFX 1862 јети јеће
SFX 1862 јети иј
SFX 1862 јети ијмо
SFX 1862 јети ијте
SFX 1862 јети ијех
SFX 1862 јети ије
SFX 1862 јети јеше
SFX 1862 јети јесмо
SFX 1862 јети јесте
SFX 1862 јети ијаху
SFX 1862 јети ијући

SFX 1863 Y 32
SFX 1863 ети ети
SFX 1863 ети есем
SFX 1863 ети есеш
SFX 1863 ети есе
SFX 1863 ети есемо
SFX 1863 ети есете
SFX 1863 ети есу
SFX 1863 ети ео
SFX 1863 ети ела
SFX 1863 ети ело
SFX 1863 ети ели
SFX 1863 ети еле
SFX 1863 ети ећу
SFX 1863 ети ећеш
SFX 1863 ети еће
SFX 1863 ети ећемо
SFX 1863 ети ећете
SFX 1863 ети еће
SFX 1863 ети еси
SFX 1863 ети есимо
SFX 1863 ети есите
SFX 1863 ети ех
SFX 1863 ети е
SFX 1863 ети еше
SFX 1863 ети есмо
SFX 1863 ети есте
SFX 1863 ети есох
SFX 1863 ети есоше
SFX 1863 ети есосмо
SFX 1863 ети есосте
SFX 1863 ети есоху
SFX 1863 ети евши

SFX 1864 Y 28
SFX 1864 ети ети
SFX 1864 ети нем
SFX 1864 ети неш
SFX 1864 ети не
SFX 1864 ети немо
SFX 1864 ети нете
SFX 1864 ети ну
SFX 1864 ети ео
SFX 1864 ети ела
SFX 1864 ети ело
SFX 1864 ети ели
SFX 1864 ети еле
SFX 1864 ети ећу
SFX 1864 ети ећеш
SFX 1864 ети еће
SFX 1864 ети ећемо
SFX 1864 ети ећете
SFX 1864 ети еће
SFX 1864 ети ни
SFX 1864 ети нимо
SFX 1864 ети ните
SFX 1864 ети ех
SFX 1864 ети е
SFX 1864 ети еше
SFX 1864 ети есмо
SFX 1864 ети есте
SFX 1864 ети љаху
SFX 1864 ети нувши

SFX 1865 Y 40
SFX 1865 ети ети
SFX 1865 ети нем
SFX 1865 ети неш
SFX 1865 ети не
SFX 1865 ети немо
SFX 1865 ети нете
SFX 1865 ети ну
SFX 1865 ети ем
SFX 1865 ети еш
SFX 1865 ети е
SFX 1865 ети емо
SFX 1865 ети ете
SFX 1865 ети еју
SFX 1865 ети ео
SFX 1865 ети ела
SFX 1865 ети ело
SFX 1865 ети ели
SFX 1865 ети еле
SFX 1865 ети ећу
SFX 1865 ети ећеш
SFX 1865 ети еће
SFX 1865 ети ећемо
SFX 1865 ети ећете
SFX 1865 ети еће
SFX 1865 ети и
SFX 1865 ети имо
SFX 1865 ети ите
SFX 1865 ети ни
SFX 1865 ети нимо
SFX 1865 ети ните
SFX 1865 ети и
SFX 1865 ети имо
SFX 1865 ети ите
SFX 1865 ети ех
SFX 1865 ети е
SFX 1865 ети еше
SFX 1865 ети есмо
SFX 1865 ети есте
SFX 1865 ети еху
SFX 1865 ети евши

SFX 1866 Y 28
SFX 1866 ти ти
SFX 1866 ти ем
SFX 1866 ти еш
SFX 1866 ти е
SFX 1866 ти емо
SFX 1866 ти ете
SFX 1866 ти у
SFX 1866 ти о
SFX 1866 ти ла
SFX 1866 ти ло
SFX 1866 ти ли
SFX 1866 ти ле
SFX 1866 ти ећу
SFX 1866 ти ећеш
SFX 1866 ти еће
SFX 1866 ти ећемо
SFX 1866 ти ећете
SFX 1866 ти еће
SFX 1866 ти и
SFX 1866 ти имо
SFX 1866 ти ите
SFX 1866 ти ех
SFX 1866 ти е
SFX 1866 ти еше
SFX 1866 ти есмо
SFX 1866 ти есте
SFX 1866 ти еху
SFX 1866 ти вши

SFX 1867 Y 23
SFX 1867 ћи ћи
SFX 1867 ћи ђем
SFX 1867 ћи ђеш
SFX 1867 ћи ђе
SFX 1867 ћи ђемо
SFX 1867 ћи ђете
SFX 1867 ћи ђу
SFX 1867 ћи шао
SFX 1867 ћи шла
SFX 1867 ћи шло
SFX 1867 ћи шли
SFX 1867 ћи шле
SFX 1867 ћи ђи
SFX 1867 ћи ђимо
SFX 1867 ћи ђите
SFX 1867 ћи ђох
SFX 1867 ћи ђе
SFX 1867 ћи ђоше
SFX 1867 ћи ђосмо
SFX 1867 ћи ђосте
SFX 1867 ћи ђаху
SFX 1867 ћи ћи
SFX 1867 ћи шавши

SFX 1868 Y 27
SFX 1868 тети тети
SFX 1868 тети тем
SFX 1868 тети тиш
SFX 1868 тети ти
SFX 1868 тети тимо
SFX 1868 тети тите
SFX 1868 тети те
SFX 1868 тети тио
SFX 1868 тети тила
SFX 1868 тети тило
SFX 1868 тети тили
SFX 1868 тети тиле
SFX 1868 тети тићу
SFX 1868 тети тићеш
SFX 1868 тети тиће
SFX 1868 тети тићемо
SFX 1868 тети тићете
SFX 1868 тети тиће
SFX 1868 тети ти
SFX 1868 тети тимо
SFX 1868 тети тите
SFX 1868 тети тех
SFX 1868 тети теше
SFX 1868 тети тесмо
SFX 1868 тети тесте
SFX 1868 тети ћаху
SFX 1868 тети тећи

SFX 1869 Y 28
SFX 1869 тети тети
SFX 1869 тети оћу
SFX 1869 тети оћеш
SFX 1869 тети оће
SFX 1869 тети оћемо
SFX 1869 тети оћете
SFX 1869 тети оће
SFX 1869 тети тео
SFX 1869 тети тела
SFX 1869 тети тело
SFX 1869 тети тели
SFX 1869 тети теле
SFX 1869 тети тећу
SFX 1869 тети тећеш
SFX 1869 тети теће
SFX 1869 тети тећемо
SFX 1869 тети тећете
SFX 1869 тети теће
SFX 1869 тети теј
SFX 1869 тети тејмо
SFX 1869 тети тејте
SFX 1869 тети тедох
SFX 1869 тети теде
SFX 1869 тети тедосмо
SFX 1869 тети тедосте
SFX 1869 тети тедоше
SFX 1869 тети отећи
SFX 1869 тети тевши

SFX 1870 Y 27
SFX 1870 тјети тјети
SFX 1870 тјети оћу
SFX 1870 тјети оћеш
SFX 1870 тјети оће
SFX 1870 тјети оћемо
SFX 1870 тјети оћете
SFX 1870 тјети оће
SFX 1870 тјети тио
SFX 1870 тјети тјела
SFX 1870 тјети тјело
SFX 1870 тјети тјели
SFX 1870 тјети тјеле
SFX 1870 тјети тјећу
SFX 1870 тјети тјећеш
SFX 1870 тјети тјеће
SFX 1870 тјети тјећемо
SFX 1870 тјети тјећете
SFX 1870 тјети тјеће
SFX 1870 тјети тједни
SFX 1870 тјети тједнимо
SFX 1870 тјети тједните
SFX 1870 тјети тједох
SFX 1870 тјети тједоше
SFX 1870 тјети тједосмо
SFX 1870 тјети тједосте
SFX 1870 тјети оћаху
SFX 1870 тјети тјећи

SFX 1871 Y 28
SFX 1871 асти асти
SFX 1871 асти атем
SFX 1871 асти атеш
SFX 1871 асти ате
SFX 1871 асти атемо
SFX 1871 асти атете
SFX 1871 асти ату
SFX 1871 асти ао
SFX 1871 асти ала
SFX 1871 асти ало
SFX 1871 асти али
SFX 1871 асти але
SFX 1871 асти ашћу
SFX 1871 асти ашћеш
SFX 1871 асти ашће
SFX 1871 асти ашћемо
SFX 1871 асти ашћете
SFX 1871 асти ашће
SFX 1871 асти ати
SFX 1871 асти атимо
SFX 1871 асти атите
SFX 1871 асти ах
SFX 1871 асти ате
SFX 1871 асти аше
SFX 1871 асти асмо
SFX 1871 асти асте
SFX 1871 асти аху
SFX 1871 асти ући

SFX 1872 Y 27
SFX 1872 ети ети
SFX 1872 ети ем
SFX 1872 ети еш
SFX 1872 ети е
SFX 1872 ети емо
SFX 1872 ети ете
SFX 1872 ети е
SFX 1872 ети ео
SFX 1872 ети ела
SFX 1872 ети ело
SFX 1872 ети ели
SFX 1872 ети еле
SFX 1872 ети ећу
SFX 1872 ети ећеш
SFX 1872 ети еће
SFX 1872 ети ећемо
SFX 1872 ети ећете
SFX 1872 ети еће
SFX 1872 ети и
SFX 1872 ети имо
SFX 1872 ети ите
SFX 1872 ети ех
SFX 1872 ети еше
SFX 1872 ети есмо
SFX 1872 ети есте
SFX 1872 ети аху
SFX 1872 ети ећи

SFX 1873 Y 28
SFX 1873 сти сти
SFX 1873 сти ем
SFX 1873 сти еш
SFX 1873 сти е
SFX 1873 сти емо
SFX 1873 сти ете
SFX 1873 сти у
SFX 1873 сти ао
SFX 1873 сти ла
SFX 1873 сти ло
SFX 1873 сти ли
SFX 1873 сти ле
SFX 1873 сти ећу
SFX 1873 сти ећеш
SFX 1873 сти еће
SFX 1873 сти ећемо
SFX 1873 сти ећете
SFX 1873 сти еће
SFX 1873 сти и
SFX 1873 сти имо
SFX 1873 сти ите
SFX 1873 сти ех
SFX 1873 сти е
SFX 1873 сти еше
SFX 1873 сти есмо
SFX 1873 сти есте
SFX 1873 сти аху
SFX 1873 сти ећи

SFX 1874 Y 29
SFX 1874 ути ути
SFX 1874 ути ујем
SFX 1874 ути ујеш
SFX 1874 ути ује
SFX 1874 ути ујемо
SFX 1874 ути ујете
SFX 1874 ути ују
SFX 1874 ути уо
SFX 1874 ути ула
SFX 1874 ути уло
SFX 1874 ути ули
SFX 1874 ути уле
SFX 1874 ути ућу
SFX 1874 ути ућеш
SFX 1874 ути уће
SFX 1874 ути ућемо
SFX 1874 ути ућете
SFX 1874 ути уће
SFX 1874 ути уј
SFX 1874 ути ујмо
SFX 1874 ути ујте
SFX 1874 ути ух
SFX 1874 ути у
SFX 1874 ути уше
SFX 1874 ути усмо
SFX 1874 ути усте
SFX 1874 ути уху
SFX 1874 ути ући
SFX 1874 ути увши

SFX 1875 Y 27
SFX 1875 ати ати
SFX 1875 ати им
SFX 1875 ати иш
SFX 1875 ати и
SFX 1875 ати имо
SFX 1875 ати ите
SFX 1875 ати а
SFX 1875 ати ао
SFX 1875 ати ала
SFX 1875 ати ало
SFX 1875 ати али
SFX 1875 ати але
SFX 1875 ати аћу
SFX 1875 ати аћеш
SFX 1875 ати аће
SFX 1875 ати аћемо
SFX 1875 ати аћете
SFX 1875 ати аће
SFX 1875 ати и
SFX 1875 ати имо
SFX 1875 ати ите
SFX 1875 ати ах
SFX 1875 ати аше
SFX 1875 ати асмо
SFX 1875 ати асте
SFX 1875 ати аху
SFX 1875 ати ећи

SFX 1876 Y 10
SFX 1876 ем ем
SFX 1876 ем еш
SFX 1876 ем е
SFX 1876 ем емо
SFX 1876 ем ете
SFX 1876 ем у
SFX 1876 ем и
SFX 1876 ем имо
SFX 1876 ем ите
SFX 1876 ем ући

SFX 1877 Y 13
SFX 1877 и и
SFX 1877 и ог
SFX 1877 и ом
SFX 1877 и оме
SFX 1877 и ога
SFX 1877 и их
SFX 1877 и им
SFX 1877 и има
SFX 1877 и а
SFX 1877 и е
SFX 1877 и ој
SFX 1877 и у
SFX 1877 и о

SFX 1878 Y 13
SFX 1878 и и
SFX 1878 и ег
SFX 1878 и ем
SFX 1878 и ему
SFX 1878 и ега
SFX 1878 и их
SFX 1878 и им
SFX 1878 и има
SFX 1878 и а
SFX 1878 и е
SFX 1878 и ој
SFX 1878 и у
SFX 1878 и ом

SFX 1879 Y 5
SFX 1879 а а
SFX 1879 а е
SFX 1879 а и
SFX 1879 а у
SFX 1879 а ом

SFX 1880 Y 9
SFX 1880 и и
SFX 1880 и их
SFX 1880 и им
SFX 1880 и има
SFX 1880 и а
SFX 1880 и е
SFX 1880 и ој
SFX 1880 и у
SFX 1880 и о

SFX 1881 Y 5
SFX 1881 так так
SFX 1881 так ци
SFX 1881 так така
SFX 1881 так цима
SFX 1881 так тке

SFX 1882 Y 13
SFX 1882 к ка
SFX 1882 к ке
SFX 1882 к ки
SFX 1882 к ким
SFX 1882 к кима
SFX 1882 к ких
SFX 1882 к ко
SFX 1882 к ког
SFX 1882 к кога
SFX 1882 к кој
SFX 1882 к ком
SFX 1882 к коме
SFX 1882 к ку

SFX 1883 Y 13
SFX 1883 ш ша
SFX 1883 ш ше
SFX 1883 ш шег
SFX 1883 ш шега
SFX 1883 ш шем
SFX 1883 ш шему
SFX 1883 ш ши
SFX 1883 ш шим
SFX 1883 ш шима
SFX 1883 ш ших
SFX 1883 ш шој
SFX 1883 ш шом
SFX 1883 ш шу

SFX 1884 Y 4
SFX 1884 и и
SFX 1884 и ас
SFX 1884 и ам
SFX 1884 и ама

SFX 1885 Y 7
SFX 1885 о о
SFX 1885 о ог
SFX 1885 о ога
SFX 1885 о ом
SFX 1885 о оме
SFX 1885 о им
SFX 1885 о име

SFX 1886 Y 5
SFX 1886 ег ега
SFX 1886 ег ем
SFX 1886 ег ему
SFX 1886 ег им
SFX 1886 ег име

SFX 1887 Y 2
SFX 1887 а а
SFX 1887 а о

SFX 1888 Y 6
SFX 1888 ене ене
SFX 1888 ене е
SFX 1888 ене ени
SFX 1888 ене и
SFX 1888 ене ном
SFX 1888 ене номе

SFX 1889 Y 18
SFX 1889 ј ј
SFX 1889 ј ја
SFX 1889 ј је
SFX 1889 ј јег
SFX 1889 ј јега
SFX 1889 ј г
SFX 1889 ј га
SFX 1889 ј јем
SFX 1889 ј јему
SFX 1889 ј м
SFX 1889 ј ме
SFX 1889 ј ји
SFX 1889 ј јим
SFX 1889 ј јима
SFX 1889 ј јих
SFX 1889 ј јој
SFX 1889 ј јом
SFX 1889 ј ју

SFX 1890 Y 3
SFX 1890 с с
SFX 1890 с м
SFX 1890 с ма

SFX 1891 Y 14
SFX 1891 ан ан
SFX 1891 ан на
SFX 1891 ан не
SFX 1891 ан ни
SFX 1891 ан ним
SFX 1891 ан нима
SFX 1891 ан них
SFX 1891 ан но
SFX 1891 ан ног
SFX 1891 ан нога
SFX 1891 ан ној
SFX 1891 ан ном
SFX 1891 ан номе
SFX 1891 ан ну

SFX 1892 Y 5
SFX 1892 е е
SFX 1892 е ој
SFX 1892 е у
SFX 1892 е ом
SFX 1892 е оме

SFX 1893 Y 4
SFX 1893 ега ега
SFX 1893 ега ему
SFX 1893 ега им
SFX 1893 ега име

SFX 1894 Y 13
SFX 1894 в ва
SFX 1894 в ве
SFX 1894 в ви
SFX 1894 в вим
SFX 1894 в вима
SFX 1894 в вих
SFX 1894 в во
SFX 1894 в вог
SFX 1894 в вога
SFX 1894 в вој
SFX 1894 в вом
SFX 1894 в воме
SFX 1894 в ву

SFX 1895 Y 13
SFX 1895 н на
SFX 1895 н не
SFX 1895 н ни
SFX 1895 н ним
SFX 1895 н нима
SFX 1895 н них
SFX 1895 н но
SFX 1895 н ног
SFX 1895 н нога
SFX 1895 н ној
SFX 1895 н ном
SFX 1895 н номе
SFX 1895 н ну

SFX 1896 Y 2
SFX 1896 х х
SFX 1896 х ма

SFX 1897 Y 15
SFX 1897 ај а
SFX 1897 ај ај
SFX 1897 ај е
SFX 1897 ај и
SFX 1897 ај им
SFX 1897 ај има
SFX 1897 ај име
SFX 1897 ај их
SFX 1897 ај о
SFX 1897 ај ог
SFX 1897 ај ога
SFX 1897 ај ој
SFX 1897 ај ом
SFX 1897 ај оме
SFX 1897 ај у

SFX 1898 Y 15
SFX 1898 ав ав
SFX 1898 ав ва
SFX 1898 ав ве
SFX 1898 ав ви
SFX 1898 ав вим
SFX 1898 ав виме
SFX 1898 ав вима
SFX 1898 ав вих
SFX 1898 ав во
SFX 1898 ав вог
SFX 1898 ав вога
SFX 1898 ав вој
SFX 1898 ав вом
SFX 1898 ав воме
SFX 1898 ав ву

SFX 1899 Y 5
SFX 1899 е е
SFX 1899 е ег
SFX 1899 е ега
SFX 1899 е ему
SFX 1899 е им

SFX 1900 Y 5
SFX 1900 ебе ебе
SFX 1900 ебе е
SFX 1900 ебе еби
SFX 1900 ебе и
SFX 1900 ебе обом

SFX 1901 Y 5
SFX 1901 и и
SFX 1901 и е
SFX 1901 и ебе
SFX 1901 и еби
SFX 1901 и обом

PFX 19 Y 1
PFX 19 0 не

PFX 988 Y 1
PFX 988 0 нај
